Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.340

Transfer of jurisdiction.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

On January 1, 1995, any complaints or other matters under investigation or consideration by the boards of legislative ethics in the house of representatives and the senate operating pursuant to *chapter 44.60 RCW shall be transferred to the legislative ethics board created by RCW 42.52.310. All files, including but not limited to minutes of meetings, investigative files, records of proceedings, exhibits, and expense records, shall be transferred to the legislative ethics board created in RCW 42.52.310 pursuant to their direction and the legislative ethics board created in RCW 42.52.310 shall assume full jurisdiction over all pending complaints, investigations, and proceedings.

[ 1994 c 154 s 204.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 44.60 RCW was repealed by 1994 c 154 s 304, effective January 1, 1995.